Massachusetts, session 194th, H2496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 223 of Chapter 111 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following subsections
“(h) Beginning December 31, 2028, from the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end
of the school day, at each public-school competitive foods and non-sweetened carbonated water
may not be sold or provided on school grounds if they contain any of the following substances:
(i) Blue 1 - CAS 3844-45-9,
(ii) Blue 2 - CAS 860-22-0,
(iii) Green 3 - CAS 2353-45-9,
(iv) Red 3 - CAS 16423-68-0,
(v) Red 40 - CAS 25956-17-6,
of 2

(vi) Yellow 5 - CAS 1934-21-0,
(vii) Yellow 6 - CAS 2783-94-0,
(i) A school may permit the sale or provision of competitive foods that do not comply
with subsection (h) of this section if the sale of such items takes place:
(i) off and away from the premises of the school; or
(ii) on school premises at least one-half hour after the end of the school day; or
(iii) at booster sales, concession stands and other school-sponsored or school-related
fundraisers and events.”
of 2